Tennessee, session 114, SB2373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-4-103, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b) The jailer may perform evaluations of the persons listed in subdivisions
(a)(1)-(7) for purposes of classification; management; care, including the need for
medical attention; control; and cell assignment.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2373
012229
- 1 -